Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5394HH (4) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2433 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âIowa Veteransâ Claims Protection Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 35E.1 Definitions. 3 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 4 requires: 5 1. âAccredited representativeâ means an attorney, claims 6 agent, or representative of a veterans service organization 7 accredited by the United States department of veterans affairs 8 pursuant to 38 C.F.R. Â§14.629. 9 2. âClaimâ means an application, request, or appeal filed 10 with the United States department of veterans affairs for 11 veteransâ benefits, services, or payments. 12 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 35E.2 Prohibited acts. 13 A person shall not do any of the following: 14 1. Directly or indirectly solicit, contract for, receive, 15 or attempt to receive any fee or compensation for assisting a 16 veteran, service member, or dependent of a veteran or service 17 member with a claim, unless the person is an accredited 18 representative. 19 2. Misrepresent the personâs United States department of 20 veterans affairs accreditation or affiliation with the United 21 States department of veterans affairs, a veterans service 22 organization, or a government agency. 23 3. Obtain or use a veteranâs or service memberâs personal 24 identifying information for unauthorized claims representation. 25 4. Make false, misleading, or deceptive statements 26 regarding the personâs ability to expedite, guarantee, or 27 influence the outcome of a claim. 28 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 35E.3 General education or referrals. 29 A person who is not an accredited representative and who 30 provides general education regarding claims or a referral to an 31 accredited representative without receiving compensation does 32 not violate section 35E.2. 33 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 35E.4 Enforcement. 34 1. The attorney general may impose a civil penalty not to 35 -1- LSB 5394HH (4) 91 sc/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2433 exceed ten thousand dollars per violation of section 35E.2. 1 Civil penalties collected under this subsection shall be 2 deposited in the veterans trust fund created in section 35A.13. 3 The attorney general may also seek an injunction or apply for 4 other equitable relief. 5 2. A veteran, service member, or dependent of a veteran 6 or service member harmed by a violation of section 35E.2 may 7 bring a civil action for damages, attorney fees, and equitable 8 relief. 9 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 35E.5 Outreach and education. 10 The department of veterans affairs shall do all of the 11 following: 12 1. Conduct outreach to educate veterans and veteransâ 13 families about predatory claims practices. 14 2. Promote awareness of assistance available through 15 accredited representatives. 16 3. Maintain a public list of accredited representatives who 17 serve Iowa veterans. 18